Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB121.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms to innocent owners pursuant to
KRS 500.090, all firearms confiscated by the Department of Kentucky State Police
and not retained for official use pursuant to KRS 500.090 shall be destroyed[sold at
public auction to:
(a) Federally licensed firearms dealers holding a license appropriate for the type
of firearm sold; or
(b) For a firearm which was used in a homicide, any person who certifies on a
form provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police prior to placing a
bid that he or she will, upon completion of the auction, leave the firearm with
the Department of Kentucky State Police for destruction. A state or local
government or agency thereof shall not purchase a firearm under this
paragraph.
(2) Any provision of KRS Chapter 45 or 45A relating to disposition of property to the
contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall:
(a) Conduct any auction specified by this section;
(b) Retain for departmental use twenty percent (20%) of the gross proceeds from
any auction specified by this section;
(c) Transfer remaining proceeds of the sale to the account of the Kentucky Office
of Homeland Security for use as provided in subsection (5) of this section;
and
(d) For any sale pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, destroy the firearm].
(2)[(3)] Prior to the destruction[sale] of any firearm, the Department of Kentucky
State Police shall make an attempt to determine if the firearm to be destroyed[sold]
has been stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained from an innocent owner and
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
return the firearm to its lawful innocent owner, unless that person is ineligible to
purchase a firearm under federal law.
(3)[(4)] The Department of Kentucky State Police shall receive firearms and
ammunition confiscated by or abandoned to every law enforcement agency in
Kentucky. The department shall dispose of the firearms received in the manner
specified in subsection (1)[subsections (1) and (2)] of this section.[ However,
firearms which are not retained for official use, returned to an innocent lawful
owner, or transferred to another government agency or public museum shall be sold
as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The proceeds of firearms sales shall be utilized by the Kentucky Office of
Homeland Security to provide grants to city, county, charter county, unified local
government, urban-county government, and consolidated local government police
departments; university safety and security departments organized pursuant to KRS
164.950; school districts that employ special law enforcement officers as defined in
KRS 61.900; airport safety and security departments established under KRS
183.880; and sheriff's departments for the purchase of:
(a) Body armor for sworn peace officers of those departments and service
animals, as defined in KRS 525.010, of those departments;
(b) Firearms or ammunition;
(c) Electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or electro-muscular
disruption technology; and
(d) Body-worn cameras.
In awarding grants under this section, the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security
shall give first priority to providing and replacing body armor and second priority to
providing firearms and ammunition, with residual funds available for the purchase
of body-worn cameras, electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or
electro-muscular disruption technology. Body armor purchased by the department
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
receiving grant funds shall meet or exceed the standards issued by the National
Institute of Justice for body armor. No police or sheriff's department shall apply for
a grant to replace existing body armor unless that body armor has been in actual use
for a period of five (5) years or longer. Any department applying for grant funds for
body-worn cameras shall develop a policy for their use and shall submit that policy
with its application for the grant funds to the Office of Homeland Security as part of
the application process.
(6) The Department of Kentucky State Police may transfer a machine gun, short-
barreled shotgun, short-barreled rifle, silencer, pistol with a shoulder stock, any
other weapon, or destructive device as defined by the National Firearms Act which
is subject to registration under the National Firearms Act and is not properly
registered in the national firearms transfer records for those types of weapons, to the
Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms of the United States Department of
Justice, after a reasonable attempt has been made to transfer the firearm to an
eligible state or local law enforcement agency or to an eligible museum and no
eligible recipient will take the firearm or weapon. National Firearms Act firearms
and weapons which are properly registered and not returned to an innocent lawful
owner or retained for official use as provided in this section shall be sold in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.]
Section 2. KRS 45.777 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of major items of equipment or real property, purchased
in whole or in part with capital construction funds, shall be deposited into the
general fund unless federal funding restraints require otherwise.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(a) The sale of real property held as right-of-way; or
(b) The sale of equipment by the Transportation Cabinet[; or
(c) The sale of confiscated firearms].
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
Section 3. KRS 147A.002 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department for Local Government shall be headed by a commissioner and
shall consist of the:
(a) Office of Financial Management and Administration, which shall be headed
by an executive director appointed by the commissioner and shall be
responsible for duties including but not limited to:
1. Local government financial assistance;
2. County budget approval;
3. Performance of various recordkeeping requirements for the
Commonwealth's cities, counties, and special districts;
4. Provision of administrative support for the state local debt officer and
the state local finance officer;
5. Administration of the county officials training incentive program set
forth in KRS 64.5275; and
6. Provision of financial analysis and guidance related to the internal
budgetary processes of the Department for Local Government;
(b) Office of Federal Grants, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for the administration
of all federal grant programs;
(c) Office of State Grants, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for the administration
of all state grant programs, including the Renaissance on Main Program, the
area development fund,[ the body armor program set forth in KRS 16.220,]
the cemetery fund program, single county coal severance grants, and any state
grant programs or individually funded projects awarded by statute or budget;
(d) Office of Legal Services, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for legal services
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
within the Department for Local Government and for its constituencies around
the Commonwealth; and
(e) Office of Field Services, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the commissioner and shall be responsible for duties including
but not limited to staffing regional offices to assist local governments.
(2) The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, shall appoint necessary
deputies, assistants, attorneys, and other employees and shall fix their compensation and
authorize payment of their expenses according to law.
Section 4. KRS 500.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 500.092, all property which is subject to forfeiture
under any section of the Kentucky Penal Code shall be disposed of in accordance
with this section.
(2) (a) Property other than firearms which is forfeited under any section of this code
may, upon order of the trial court, be destroyed by the sheriff of the county in
which the conviction was obtained.
(b) Property other than firearms which is forfeited under any section of this code
may, upon order of the trial court, be sold at public auction. The expenses of
keeping and selling such property and the amount of all valid recorded liens
that are established by intervention as being bona fide shall be paid out of the
proceeds of the sale. The balance shall be paid to:
1. The state, if the property was seized by an agency of the state or peace
officer thereof;
2. The county, if the property was seized by the sheriff or an agency or
peace officer of the county;
3. The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, if the property was
seized by a peace officer of the Department of Fish and Wildlife or was
seized by any other officer for violation of KRS Chapter 150;
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
4. The city, if the property was seized by the city or by an agency or peace
officer thereof and the property was delivered to the city property clerk;
5. The city (ninety percent (90%) of the proceeds) and the sheriff (ten
percent (10%) of the proceeds), if the property was seized by the city or
by an agency or peace officer thereof and the property was delivered to
the sheriff or the county police; or
6. The state, if the property was seized by any combination of agencies
listed above.
(c) 1. Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms and ammunition to
innocent owners pursuant to this section, all firearms and ammunition
confiscated by a state or local law enforcement agency, all firearms
ordered forfeited by a court, and all abandoned firearms and ammunition
coming into the custody of a state or local law enforcement agency and
not retained for official use shall be transferred to the Department of
Kentucky State Police for disposition as provided by KRS 16.220.
2. The transfer shall occur not more than ninety (90) days after the
abandonment of the firearm or ammunition to the law enforcement
agency or not more than ninety (90) days after its confiscation, unless a
court requires the firearm or ammunition for use as evidence, in which
case it shall be transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police
not more than ninety (90) days following the order of forfeiture by the
court or after the court returns the firearm or ammunition from use as
evidence.[ Prior to the sale of any firearm or ammunition, the law
enforcement agency shall make a bona fide attempt to determine if the
firearm or ammunition to be sold has been stolen or otherwise
unlawfully obtained from an innocent owner and return the firearm and
ammunition to its lawful innocent owner, unless that person is ineligible
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
to purchase a firearm under federal law. This subsection relating to
auction of firearms and ammunition shall not apply to firearms and
ammunition auctioned by the Department of Fish and Wildlife that may
be sold to individual purchasers residing in Kentucky who are eligible
under federal law to purchase firearms and ammunition of the type
auctioned.]
(d) If property which is forfeited under any section of this code is determined by
the trial court to be worthless, encumbered with liens in excess of its value, or
otherwise a burdensome asset, the court may abandon any interest in such
property. Property which is abandoned pursuant to this section shall be
returned to the lawful claimant upon payment of expenses for keeping the
property.
(e) Property which is forfeited under any section of this code may, upon order of
the trial court, be retained for official use in the following manner:[.]
1. Property which has been seized by an agency of the state may be
retained for official state use;[.]
2. Property which has been seized by an agency of a county, city, charter
county government,[or] urban-county government, consolidated local
government, or unified local government may be retained for official
use by the government whose agency seized the property or for official
state use; and[.]
3. Property seized by any other unit of government may be retained only
for official state use.
The expenses for keeping and transferring such property shall be paid by the
unit of government by which the property is retained.
(3)[(2)] Money which has been obtained or conferred in violation of any section of
this code shall, upon conviction, be forfeited for the use of the state. This subsection
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
shall not apply when, during the course of the proceeding in which the conviction is
obtained, the person from whom said money was unlawfully acquired is identified.
(4)[(3)] Property forfeited under any section of this code shall be disposed of in
accordance with this section only after being advertised pursuant to KRS Chapter
424. This subsection shall not apply to property which is designed and suitable only
for criminal use or to money forfeited under subsection (3)[(2)] of this section.
(5)[(4)] The trial court shall remit the forfeiture of property when the lawful claimant:
(a) Asserts his or her claim before disposition of the property pursuant to this
section;
(b) Establishes his or her legal interest in the property; and
(c) Establishes that the unlawful use of the property was without his or her
knowledge and consent. This subsection shall not apply to a lienholder of
record when the trial court elects to dispose of the property pursuant to
subsection (2)[(1)](b) of this section.
(6)[(5)] For purposes of this section, "lawful claimant" means owner or lienholder of
record.
(7)[(6)] (a) Before property which has had its identity obscured in violation of KRS
514.120 may be sold or retained for official use as provided in this section, the
court shall cause a serial or other identifying number to be placed thereon, and
a record of the number assigned shall be placed in the court order authorizing
the sale or retention of the property. This number shall be assigned, whenever
applicable, in consultation with the Department of Kentucky State Police and
any other state or federal regulatory agency.
(b) The purchaser of the property shall be given a document stating that the
property had been forfeited pursuant to law and that a number, shown on the
document, has been assigned which shall be deemed as compliance of the
owner with KRS 514.120. When property is returned to an owner pursuant to
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
this section and its identity has been obscured by another person in violation
of KRS 514.120, the court shall provide a document to the owner relieving
him or her of liability for its continued possession. This document shall serve
as evidence of compliance with KRS 514.120 by the owner or any person to
whom he or she lawfully disposes of the property.
(c) This section shall not apply to any person after property has been sold or
returned in compliance with this section who violates the provisions of KRS
514.120 with respect to that property.
(8)[(7)] (a) Before forfeiture of any property under this section, it shall be the duty
of the trial court to determine if a lawful owner or claimant to the property has
been identified or is identifiable. If a lawful owner or claimant has been
identified or is identifiable, the court shall notify the owner or claimant that
the property is being held and specify a reasonable period of time during
which the claim may be made or may, in lieu thereof, order the return of the
property to the lawful owner or claimant.
(b) If the lawful owner or claimant does not assert his or her claim to the property
after notification or if he or she renounces his or her claim to the property, the
property shall be disposed of as provided in this section.
(c) It shall be the duty of all peace officers and other public officers or officials
having knowledge of the lawful owner or claimant of property subject to
forfeiture to report the same to the trial court before the act of forfeiture
occurs.
Section 5. KRS 500.093 is amended to read as follows:
No court or law enforcement agency shall retain a firearm or ammunition for official use
for the purpose of avoiding transfer of the firearm or ammunition to the Department of
Kentucky State Police under KRS 237.090 or 500.090, or other statute to avoid its being
destroyed[sold] pursuant to KRS 16.220.
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
Section 6. KRS 514.065 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "telecommunications service" means any communication
service ordinarily provided for a charge or compensation to facilitate the
origination, transmission, emission, or reception of signs, signals, writings, images,
sounds, or intelligence of any nature by telephone, including but not limited to
cellular and personal communications service, as terms may be defined in 47 C.F.R.
parts 22 and 24, respectively, telephones, wire, radio, electromagnetic,
photoelectronic, or photooptical systems, but excluding cable television services,
even if provided by a telephone utility.
(2) A person is guilty of possession, use, or transfer for use of a device for theft of
telecommunications services when the person:
(a) Makes, assembles, or possesses any instrument, apparatus, equipment, or
device designed, modified, altered, programmed, reprogrammed, or otherwise
adapted for or used for commission of a theft of telecommunications services
in violation of KRS 514.060; or
(b) Sells, gives, transports, or otherwise transfers to another, or offers or
advertises to sell, give, or otherwise transfer any instrument, apparatus,
equipment, or device described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, or plans or
instructions for making or assembling the same under circumstances evincing
an intent to use or employ the instrument, apparatus, equipment, or device, or
to allow the same to be used or employed, for a purpose described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, or knowing or having reason to believe that
the same is intended to be so used, or that the aforesaid plans or instructions
are intended to be used for making or assembling the instrument, apparatus,
equipment, or device.
(3) An instrument, apparatus, equipment or device described in paragraph (a) of
subsection (2) of this section shall not include any instrument, apparatus,
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 219
equipment, or device authorized or approved or otherwise permitted by an agency
of the federal government or the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(4) Possession, use, or transfer for use of a device for theft of telecommunications
services is a Class A misdemeanor unless the defendant has previously been
convicted of violating this section, in which case it is a Class D felony.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any instrument, apparatus,
equipment, or device designed, modified, altered, programmed, reprogrammed, or
otherwise adapted for or used for commission of a theft of telecommunications
service in violation of KRS 514.060, may be seized under warrant or incident to a
lawful arrest for the violation of KRS 514.060, and, upon the conviction of any
person for a violation, the court shall order any instrument, apparatus, equipment,
device, or plans or instructions for making or assembling them forfeited to the state
or destroyed in accordance with KRS 500.090(2)[(1)](a), or if requested by the
person providing the telecommunications service in the territory in which they were
seized, turned over to the telecommunications service provider.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 9/17/2025 11:46 AM Jacketed